Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-10] Powers of insurers and hospital
and medical service corporations. (a) An insurance company licensed in
this State, or a hospital or medical service corporation authorized to do
business in this State, either directly or through a subsidiary or affiliate,
may organize and operate a dental insurer under the provisions of this
chapter. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any two or more
insurance companies, hospital or medical service corporations, dental insurers,
or subsidiaries or affiliates thereof, may jointly organize and operate a dental
insurer. The business of insurance is deemed to include the providing of
dental care services by a dental insurer owned or operated by an insurer or a
subsidiary thereof.

(b) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of
laws pertaining to insurance or hospital or medical service corporations under
chapter 431, 432, or 432D, an insurer or a hospital or medical service
corporation may contract with a dental insurer to provide insurance or similar protection
against the cost of dental care services provided through dental insurers and
to provide coverage in the event of the failure of the dental insurer to meet
its obligations. The enrollees of a dental insurer constitute a group
permitted under chapter 431, 432, or 432D. Among other things, under such
contracts, the insurer or hospital or medical service corporation may make
benefit payments to dental insurers for dental care services rendered by
providers. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next